test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vwima_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `võima: # Verb (72+73) `võima 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     võima+V+Inf/mA: võima
     võima+V+Inf: võidaq
     võima+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: või
     võima+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [võit, võidõq]
     võima+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: või
     võima+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: võimiq
     võima+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [võitiq, võit, võidõq]
     võima+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: võivaq
     võima+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: [või, või-iq, võiq]

     võima+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [võisõ, võidsõ]
     võima+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: [võisõt, võisõq, võisõdõq, võidsõt, võidsõq, võidsõdõq]
     võima+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [võisõ, võidsõ]
     võima+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [võisõmiq, võisõ, võidsõmiq, võidsõ]
     võima+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [võisõtiq, võisõt, võisõq, võisõdõq, võidsõtiq, võidsõt, võidsõq, võidsõdõq]
     võima+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: [võisõq, võisõvaq, võidsõq, võidsõvaq]
     võima+V+Ind+Prt+Sc+ConNeg: [või, võiq]
     võima+V+Ind+Prt+Sc+Neg: või-is

     võima+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: võiva
     võima+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: võiva
     võima+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Par: võivat
     võima+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: võivahe
     võima+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: võivaq
     võima+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: võividõ
     võima+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Par: võivit
     võima+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: võivihe

     võima+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Nom: võinuq
     võima+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Gen: võinuq
     võima+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Par: võinut
     võima+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Ill: võinuhe
     võima+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Nom: võinuq
     võima+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Gen: [võinuidõ, võinuisi]
     võima+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Par: [võinuid, võinuisi]
     võima+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Ill: [võinuihe, võinuisihe]


     võima+V+ActPrtPrc: võinuq
     võima+V+PssPrtPrc: võit
